Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-805
Governing body; rules and regulations; rates and charges; adopt.

The governing body of any such city of the first class shall make all necessary rules and regulations governing the use, operation, and control thereof. In the exercise of the grant of power herein set forth, the city of the first class may make contracts with other departments of the city, or others, if such contracts are necessary and needed for the payment of the revenue bonds authorized herein and for the successful operation of the parking facilities. The governing board shall also establish and maintain equitable rates or charges for such services sufficient in amount to pay for the cost of operation, repair, and upkeep of the facilities to be purchased, acquired, or leased, and the principal of and interest on any revenue bonds issued pursuant to the provisions of sections 16-801 to 16-811. The governing body may also make any other agreements with the purchasers of the bonds for the security of the issuing city and the purchasers of such bonds not in contravention with the provisions of sections 16-801 to 16-811.

Laws 1955, c. 35, § 5, p. 145.